Idaho, session 2026, S1342.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 25, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 41, Title 25, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 41
HOUSEHOLD EGG PRODUCTION AND FOOD SECURITY ACT
25-4101. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known and shall be cited as
"The Household Egg Production and Food Security Act."
25-4102. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:
(1) Many Idaho residents who live in single-family residences are cur-
rently prohibited from producing eggs for household consumption due to local
ordinances or restrictions;
(2) Eggs are a basic food staple, and household egg production supports
food security, self-reliance, and family resilience;
(3) Agriculture is foundational to Idaho's economy and future. Modern
nutrition guidance increasingly emphasizes whole, nutrient-dense foods and
balanced diets that support metabolic health;
(4) Eggs are a foundational nutrient-dense food that aligns with
such dietary principles and contributes to household food quality and re-
silience; and
(5) This chapter supports agricultural literacy and responsible house-
hold food production by establishing a minimum statewide standard to prevent
total prohibitions on household egg production, while preserving reasonable
local government and homeowner's association authority related to health,
safety, and nuisance concerns.
25-4103. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Hen" means a female chicken.
(2) "Homeowner's association" has the same meaning as provided in sec-
tion 55-3203, Idaho Code.
(3) "Political subdivision" means a city, county, or other unit of lo-
cal government within the state of Idaho.
(4) "Single-family residence" means a detached residential dwelling
designed for occupancy by one (1) household and does not include apartments,
condominiums, duplexes, townhomes, or other multifamily dwellings.


25-4104. HOUSEHOLD EGG PRODUCTION -- MINIMUM STATEWIDE STANDARD. (1)
Notwithstanding any ordinance, resolution, rule, covenant, condition, or
restriction to the contrary, an owner or occupant of a single-family resi-
dence may keep up to four (4) hens for household egg production.
(2) Additional hens may be kept as allowed by a political subdivision or
homeowner's association.
(3) Roosters are prohibited unless expressly permitted by a political
subdivision or homeowner's association.
(4) Eggs produced pursuant to this section may be sold, bartered, or ex-
changed, provided such sales comply with applicable Idaho food safety and
cottage food laws governing small-scale, home-based food production.
25-4105. AUTHORITY PRESERVED. Nothing in this chapter shall be con-
strued to prohibit a political subdivision or homeowner's association from
adopting or enforcing reasonable regulations related to sanitation, enclo-
sure, location, noise, odor, pest control, or nuisance prevention, or from
limiting or prohibiting household egg production at multifamily dwellings,
provided such regulations do not prohibit the household egg production au-
thorized by this chapter.
25-4106. PROSPECTIVE APPLICATION. This chapter applies prospectively
only and does not affect any enforcement action, fine, penalty, or legal pro-
ceeding that was final prior to July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.